Washington statutes.
RCW 19.142.020

Membership plans—Special offers—Misrepresentations prohibited.

(1) Each health studio shall prepare and provide to each prospective buyer a written comprehensive list of all membership plans of health studio services offered for sale by the health studio. The list shall contain a description and the respective price of each membership plan of health studio services offered.

(2) A health studio is prohibited from selling a membership plan of health studio services not included in the list.

(3) A health studio is prohibited from making a special offer or offering a discount unless such special offer or discount is made in writing and available to all prospective members: PROVIDED, That a special offer or discount offered to groups need not be available to all similarly-situated prospective members.

(4) A health studio is prohibited from making any misrepresentation to any prospective buyer or current member regarding qualifications of staff, availability or quality of facilities or services, or results obtained through exercise, body building, figure development, or weight loss programs, or the present or maximum number of customers who may contract to use the facilities or services.

[ 1987 c 317 s 3.]